District of Columbia statutes.
1-104

District as successor corporation.

The District of Columbia is the successor of the corporations of Washington and Georgetown, and all the property of said corporations, and of the County of Washington, is vested in the District of Columbia.

History

R.S., D.C., § 96

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-104.
1973 Ed., § 1-104.